District of Columbia statutes.
42-3221

Action by landlord for use and occupation of property where no deed; parol agreement as evidence of quantum of damages.

It shall and may be lawful to and for the landlord or landlords, where the agreement is not by deed, to recover a reasonable satisfaction for the lands, tenements, or hereditaments, held or occupied by the defendant or defendants, in an action on the case, for the use and occupation of what was so held or enjoyed; and if in evidence on the trial of such action any parol demise or any agreement (not being by deed) whereon a certain rent was reserved shall appear, the plaintiff in such action shall not therefor be nonsuited, but may make use thereof as an evidence of the quantum of the damages to be recovered.

11 Geo. 2, ch. 19, § 14, 1738
Kilty’s Rep. 251
Alex. Br. Stat. 738
Comp. Stat. D.C., 333, § 63

History

1981 Ed., § 45-1421.
1973 Ed., § 45-923.

Prior Codifications